Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6659YH (2) 91 lh/ns H.F. 2692 Section 1. Section 22.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 24. The seal required pursuant to section 3 544A.28 or 544B.12, and the seal and signature required 4 pursuant to section 544C.14. Any plan or specification to 5 which a seal or signature, as applicable, is affixed shall not 6 be considered a confidential record unless otherwise provided 7 by law. 8